Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2083
Surgical infections; report required.

Each hospital licensed in Nebraska shall, at least annually, provide surgeons performing surgery at such hospital a report as to the number and rates of surgical infections in surgical patients of such surgeon.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 112.